Tennessee, session 114, SB0768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-629(b), is amended by
deleting "January 1" wherever it appears and substituting "January 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0768
002800
- 1 -